Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 41 ORGANIZATION AND POWERS
11-41-115. Interest rates on loans.

Any savings and loan association may charge, contract for, and recover such rate of interest as may be provided in the notes or other evidences of indebtedness taken by the association. Notes secured solely by the pledge of shares and notes secured by real estate mortgages repayable upon the sinking fund plan shall be nonnegotiable in form, and all other notes, including those insured by the federal housing administrator and those taken in connection with loans to veterans under the provisions of the "Servicemen's Readjustment Act of 1944", may be either negotiable or nonnegotiable in form.

A substantial portion of the business of all associations shall be devoted to the acceptance of savings deposits from or the sale of their shares to their members and the lending of those funds to their members as set forth in section 11-40-103 and otherwise in articles 40 to 46 of this title, but associations may also purchase loans of a type which they are permitted to make and sell loans with or without recourse so long as such purchase or sale of loans is conducted as a part of and in connection with the other permitted business activities of an association.

Each mortgage loan sold by an association may be sold with or without recourse and, if under a contract to service the same, shall be sold on a basis which will reimburse the association adequately for the cost of such servicing. All sale and servicing agreements shall be in writing and on file in the association.

No interest that may accrue to an association shall be deemed usurious, and the same may be collected as debts of like amount are now by law collected in this state.

No law of this state limiting interest or interest rates or the compounding of interest shall apply to any graduated payment mortgage or deed of trust made to individuals, or any mortgage or deed of trust to individuals where periodic disbursement of part of the loan proceeds is made by an association over a period of time as established by the mortgage or deed of trust, or over an expressed period of time ending with the death of such individuals, including but not limited to mortgages or deeds of trust having provisions for adding deferred interest to principal or otherwise providing for the charging of interest on interest.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 305, § 11.

CSA:

C. 25, § 14.

L. 45:

p. 239, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-15.

L. 71:

p. 1146, § 4.

L. 79:

(5) added, p. 431, § 5, effective June 19.

L. 83:

(3) amended, p. 493, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(3) amended, p. 66, § 8, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the "Servicemen's Readjustment Act of 1944", see Pub.L. 78-346, codified at 38 U.S.C. § 1801 et seq.

11-41-116. Where associations may operate.

Upon approval of the commissioner, a savings and loan association may conduct business in this state, in other states, in the District of Columbia, in the territories and colonies of the United States, and in foreign countries, and have one or more offices out of this state, and own, hold, purchase, mortgage, lease, and convey real and personal property out of this state if such powers are included within the objects set forth in its articles of incorporation and are not in violation of any other provision of articles 40 to 46 of this title.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 296, § 11.

CSA:

C. 25, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-16.

11-41-117. Insurance of shares.

A savings and loan association shall obtain and maintain insurance of its shares with the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor as provided by the "Federal Deposit Insurance Act", 12 U.S.C. sec. 1811 et seq., and any amendments thereto. Notice of any such actions by associations shall be submitted to the division.

The commissioner, in connection with all such insured associations, shall furnish said insurance corporation with reports of examination, orders, and requirements issued in connection therewith and other information coming to his attention bearing on the financial condition and administration and may collaborate with said corporation in any merger, reorganization, dissolution, liquidation, or examination and audit of any such insured association.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 241, § 13.

CSA:

C. 25, § 14(1).

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-17.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 466, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 137, § 15, effective July 1.

11-41-117.5. Insurance of obligations.

A savings and loan association shall obtain and maintain insurance of its obligations, including accounts, with the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor.

An association is further authorized to obtain and maintain insurance of any obligations, including accounts, or portions thereof not otherwise insured pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, with any federal agency, with any state agency, or with any other insurer meeting the requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection (2).

Any insurer insuring obligations pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), other than the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor shall be certified by the commissioner as having met the following:

The contract of insurance contemplated is written upon substantially the same basis as to form, coverage, maturity, voluntary and involuntary termination, and other provisions as the insurance contract provided at that time by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor and complies with such further requirements for protection as the commissioner may promulgate by rule.

The insurer has a net worth or, in the case of a governmental or statutorily authorized entity, reserves reasonably commensurate with the risks underwritten.

The insurer, if a nongovernmental entity, is authorized to do business in this state as an insurer or is otherwise authorized by law to insure obligations.

Within twenty days after June 30 and December 31 of each year, each insurer certified pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section shall file with the commissioner a report for the preceding six months showing its financial condition. Said report shall be prepared, insofar as possible, in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles.

The commissioner or his duly designated representative may investigate the affairs and examine the books, accounts, records, and files of the insurer at such intervals as the commissioner deems prudent, but not less than once a year, and shall have free access for such purposes. Costs of such investigations and examinations shall be paid by the insurer. If any such investigation or examination reveals that the insurer is not conducting its affairs in accordance with this section or that the insurer is not actuarially sound or is impaired and may be unable to fulfill its obligations, the commissioner may exercise any powers available under article 44 of this title until such time as compliance is restored or the impairment is terminated.

The commissioner and the insurer may exchange information regarding an insured savings and loan association.

The commissioner shall determine as of June 30 each year the cost of supervision of the insurer and shall assess such cost against the insurer. The assessment shall be paid on or before September 30 following assessment.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 497, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 84:

(3) to (6) added, p. 378, § 3, effective May 11.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 466, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1), IP(2)(b), and (2)(b)(I) amended, p. 137, § 16, effective July 1.

11-41-118. Loans - investment in notes or bonds.

Savings and loan associations are authorized:

To make such loans and advances of credit and purchases of obligations representing loans and advances of credit as are eligible for insurance by the federal housing administrator and to obtain such insurance;

To make such loans, secured by real property or leasehold, as the federal housing administrator insures or makes a commitment to insure and to obtain such insurance.

Associations may sell any loans authorized by this section, and each such loan sold by an association shall be sold without recourse and, if under a contract to service the same, on a basis which will reimburse the association adequately for the cost of such servicing. All sale and servicing agreements shall be in writing and on file in the association.

It shall be lawful for savings and loan associations to invest their funds and the moneys in their custody or possession which are eligible for investment in notes or bonds secured by mortgage or trust deed insured by the federal housing administrator, and in obligations of national mortgage associations or similar credit institutions organized under Title III of the "National Housing Act", and in debentures issued by the federal housing administrator.

No laws of this state requiring security upon which loans or investments may be made, or prescribing the nature, amount, or form of such security, or prescribing or limiting the period for which loans or investments may be made, or affecting the negotiability of the loan instrument shall be deemed to apply to loans or investments made pursuant to this section.

An association may make loans for the purpose of mobile home financing, subject to any limitation as to maximum loan amounts which may be prescribed from time to time by the commissioner for all associations. For the purposes of this subsection (5), "mobile home" means a mobile accommodation used or designed for use as living quarters.

An association may make loans for the repair, equipping, alteration, or improvement of any real property, including mobile homes, subject to such restrictions, limitations, prohibitions, conditions, and provisions as the commissioner may from time to time, by rule or regulation duly adopted, prescribe.

An association may make loans or invest in obligations and advances of credit, referred to in this article as "loans", for the payment of expenses for postsecondary school education; but the total aggregate principal amount of an association's investment in such loans, exclusive of any investment which is or which at the time of its making was otherwise authorized, shall not exceed five percent of its invested capital.

An association may issue letters of credit, subject to regulation by the commissioner pursuant to section 11-44-103.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 242, § 14.

CSA:

C. 25, § 14(2).

L. 43:

p. 201, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-18.

L. 69:

p. 1015, § 7.

L. 73:

p. 237, § 16.

L. 75:

(5) and (6) amended, p. 1464, § 2, effective July 18.

L. 76:

(6) amended, p. 394, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 79:

(6) amended, p. 431, § 6, effective June 19.

L. 83:

(8) added, p. 499, § 1, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the "National Housing Act", see Pub.L. 73-479, codified at 12 U.S.C. § 1701 et seq.

11-41-119. Loans to members and other loans.

An association may invest any portion of its funds in loans to its members, secured by first lien trust deeds or mortgages upon improved real estate; except that additional loans or advances on the same property secured by additional encumbrances shall be deemed to be first liens for the purposes of articles 40 to 46 of this title, unless an intervening lien has been recorded, and upon the shares issued by such association, or upon both such securities; and except that, only in the case of an association not subject to regulation by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor, no one loan can be made in excess of five percent of the gross assets of the association at the close of the preceding month, nor in any event shall the total of loans in excess of fifty thousand dollars exceed twenty percent of the gross assets of the association at the close of the preceding month.

An association may make loans on the security of its shares if the association obtains a first lien upon, or a pledge of, such account as security therefor. No such loan may exceed the withdrawal or repurchase value of the account securing the loan, and no such loan shall be made when there is an impairment of invested share capital or when the association has any application for withdrawal which has been on file and unpaid more than thirty days. Upon any default of such loan, the association may, after giving ten days' written notice to the last address of the owner of such account appearing on the books of the association, cancel such account, to the extent and in the amount sufficient to repay said loan and accrued interest thereon. The commissioner may prescribe such regulations concerning such certificate share loans as may be necessary.

An association may make real estate loans, secured by encumbrances provided for in subsection (1) of this section, repayable upon the following plans:

Installment loans. Loans may be made or purchased for an amount not in excess of ninety-five percent of the appraised value of the tendered security, repayable within forty years in consecutive monthly, quarterly, or annual installments, equal or unequal. Lump-sum payments may be required in the initial contract. The provisions and limitations of this paragraph (a) shall not apply if authority is otherwise permitted by federal law, rule, or regulation.

The initial contract may provide for changes in the interest rate based upon an index agreed to by the borrower and the association. Such provision shall specify that changes in the index shall apply equally to increases or decreases in the interest rate. Decreases shall be mandatory and increases may be at the option of the association. Interest changes may be implemented through changes in the installment amount or the rate of amortization, or any combination thereof, as provided in the initial contract. The installment amount may not be increased more often than at the end of any consecutive twelve-month period of the loan term, and shall be sufficient to amortize the remaining principal balance within forty years from the initial date of the loan.

Loans without amortization. Loans of any type that an association may make on an installment basis may also be made without amortization of principal; but interest shall be payable at least annually, and any such loan may be made for an amount not in excess of eighty percent of the appraised value of the property and for a term of not more than twenty years. The aggregate amount of such loans shall not, at any time, exceed an amount equal to twenty percent of the association's gross assets. In no case may an association provide a loan or loans under this subsection (3) to any one borrower which exceeds five percent of the association's gross assets.

Construction loans. Loans may be made without full amortization of principal if made for the purpose of construction; but any such loan may be made for an amount not in excess of ninety percent of the appraised value of the property, excluding cost of land, and for a term of not more than one year.

Sinking fund loans. Loans made under this plan shall be repayable by crediting to such loans the certificate value of pledged savings shares. Such borrowing members shall be required to carry such monthly periodical savings shares with the association as shall have a par value equal to the loan, and every share issued shall be subject to a lien for any advance made thereon or other lawful claims against the holder, and the payments on such pledged shares shall not be less than thirty-five cents per share per month. At the beginning of foreclosure of any mortgage or trust deed to an association securing such sinking fund loans, credit shall be allowed on the mortgage indebtedness for the value of any pledged shares held by the association as collateral for the loan, and the shares shall be canceled at the conclusion of the foreclosure proceedings.

Insured or guaranteed loans. An association may make such loans as may be insured or guaranteed by an agency of the federal or state government in such amounts and upon such terms as may be provided by the statutes and regulations affecting such loans, and the proviso in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall not apply to such insured or guaranteed loans.

Other loans. Any association operating under articles 40 to 46 of this title, notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained therein, may make any type or kind of loan and for any purpose that a federal savings and loan association at any time may be authorized to make by any law, rule, regulation, decision, or order which is or may be applicable to federal savings and loan associations. The commissioner, by rule or regulation duly adopted and applicable to all associations, may also authorize all associations organized and operating under articles 40 to 46 of this title to make any investment, in addition to those expressly permitted by said articles 40 to 46, which federal savings and loan associations are authorized to make by any laws, rules, regulations, decisions, or orders applicable to such federal savings and loan associations; but any rule or regulation adopted by the commissioner granting other investment authority shall, to the extent found by the commissioner to be applicable, be subject to the same limitations, restrictions, prohibitions, conditions, and provisions as are applicable in the case of federal savings and loan associations.

Loans secured by first lien trust deeds or mortgages upon improved real estate shall not be made until a signed application for such loan has been submitted, nor until a signed appraisal has been submitted, nor until the loan has been approved by the board of directors or by a committee authorized by the board of directors. Appraisals may be made by any two of the association's directors, officers, employees, or attorneys or by an independent appraiser who is not a director, officer, employee, or attorney of the association; but no such officer, director, employee, or attorney shall act as an appraiser nor act on any committee approving a loan in which he has an interest either in the property tendered as security or in the sale of the property. The association shall furnish to each borrower, upon the closing of the loan, a loan settlement statement, indicating in detail the charges or fees such borrower has paid or obligated himself to pay to the association or to any other person in connection with such loan, and a copy of such statement shall be retained in the records of the association.

Every real estate loan shall be evidenced by a proper instrument in writing obligating the borrower to repay the full amount of the loan and shall be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust constituting a first lien upon real estate securing the loan or, if an additional advance, by a deed of trust or mortgage properly providing for such additional advance. An encumbrance shall provide specifically for full protection to the association with respect to usual insurance risks, taxes, special assessments, other governmental levies, and maintenance and repairs and may provide for an assignment of rents and the appointment of a receiver upon any default.

An association may pay taxes, special assessments, insurance premiums, repairs, and other charges for the protection of the real estate security. All such payments may be charged to a special account or may be added to the unpaid principal balance of the loan and shall be equally secured by the first lien on the real property. An association may require life insurance to be assigned as additional security upon any real estate loan; in such event, the association shall obtain a first lien upon such policy and may advance premiums thereon, and such premium advances may be added to the unpaid principal of the loan and shall be equally secured by the first lien on the security property.

An association may require the borrower to pay monthly in advance, in addition to interest or interest and principal payments, a prorated portion of the estimated annual taxes, assessments, insurance premiums, and other charges upon the real estate securing the loan, or any of such charges, so as to enable the association to pay such charges as they become due from the funds so received. The amount of such monthly charges may be adjusted by the association as the need therefor arises. Every association shall keep an accurate record of the status of taxes, assessments, insurance premiums, and other charges on all real estate securing its loans and on all real and other property owned by it.

Payment on the principal indebtedness of all loans on real estate security shall be applied directly to the reduction of such indebtedness. Payments on all monthly installment loans, other than construction loans, insured loans, and guaranteed loans, shall begin not later than sixty days after the date of the note. Insured loans and guaranteed loans may be repayable upon terms acceptable to the insuring or guaranteeing agency. An association may charge, for the privilege of prepayment in part or in full of a loan relating to an owner-occupied single family residence, if the original contract so provides, an amount not greater than ninety days' interest on the amount prepaid. An association may charge, for the privilege of prepayment in part or in full for any loan not otherwise specifically provided for in this subsection (9), an amount specified in the original contract. Any loan contract may be modified by the parties by written agreement and within the limitations of this section as the need therefor may arise.

An association may make additional advances secured by the original encumbrance if the original loan contract makes proper provision therefor.

An association may purchase loans of any type that it may make, and it may also purchase insured or guaranteed loans made on homes wherever located; but no loan may be purchased from an affiliated company or an officer, director, employee, or attorney of the association without prior approval of the board of directors.

If additional collateral is encumbered on any loan as additional security, an association may invest in said loan for an amount in excess of the percentage provided in paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of this section. Said association may accept as such additional collateral any security it is authorized to invest in as set forth in section 11-41-114; but such encumbered additional security shall not increase the maximum percentage of said loan beyond the actual value of such additional security.

An association may lend on the security of a first security interest on stock or a membership certificate issued to a tenant-stockholder or resident-member by a cooperative housing corporation organized under article 33.5 of title 38, C.R.S., and as defined by section 216 of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, and the assignment by way of security of the borrower's interest in the proprietary lease or right of tenancy in property covered by such cooperative housing corporation, if all of the real property owned by such corporation is located within the state and if such loan is made subject to the same limitations, restrictions, prohibitions, conditions, and provisions as are applicable in the case of federal savings and loan associations.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 245, § 18.

CSA:

C. 25, § 14(3).

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-19.

L. 55:

p. 757, § 3.

L. 61:

p. 649, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-19.

L. 65:

p. 970, § 1.

L. 69:

p. 1015, § 8.

L. 75:

(4) amended, p. 373, § 2, effective June 26.

L. 77:

(3)(a) and (4) amended, p. 570, §§ 4, 5, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(13) added, p. 706, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(3)(a) and (3)(b) amended, p. 625, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 83:

(9) amended, p. 500, § 1, effective April 29.

L. 2000:

(13) amended, p. 1841, § 13, effective August 2.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 149, § 55, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", see title 26 of the United States Code.

11-41-119.5. Reporting of loans. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 457, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 30, § 3, effective March 13.

11-41-120. Branches. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 33:

p. 306, § 13.

CSA:

C. 25, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-20.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 378, § 4, effective May 11.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 666, § 6, effective May 31.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1208, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 137, § 17, effective July 1.

11-41-121. Merger, consolidation, and transfer.

As used in this section, the word "association" shall include federal savings and loan associations incorporated under the "Home Owners' Loan Act of 1933".

(1.5) (a) A domestic association may merge with a foreign association and, subject to the limitations specified in this subsection (1.5), notwithstanding any other provision of articles 40 to 46 of this title to the contrary, if the association proposing to merge with a domestic association is a foreign association, the foreign association shall, in addition to submitting all information pertinent to the evaluation of the application under this section that the commissioner may require together with all applicable fees, meet the following criteria:

The foreign association seeking the merger shall have deposits that it may hold insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor in accordance with the provisions of section

11-41-117

; and

The foreign association shall be in compliance with the capital requirements specified in this subparagraph (II) as follows:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 149, § 56, effective July 1, 2004.)

On and after January 1, 1993, the foreign association shall have a ratio of total capital to total assets of not less than six percent or the prevailing regulatory capital requirements established by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor, whichever is greater; and

(II.5) Once a capital threshold is established in accordance with the provisions of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) it shall be the prevailing standard for purposes of this section to be applied by the commissioner regardless of any reduction below the prevailing regulatory capital threshold requirement unless the general assembly authorizes the application of a lower standard; and

The commissioner shall not approve any proposed merger under the provisions of this subsection (1.5) if the merger would result in the foreign association controlling at the time of the merger more than twenty-five percent of the aggregate of all deposits in all banks, savings and loan associations, federal savings banks, and other financial institutions located in Colorado, which are federally insured. For the purposes of this subsection (1.5), deposits shall be determined based upon the public reports most recently filed with the appropriate federal regulatory agency; and

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1.5), the foreign association shall be domiciled or conduct its principal operations in a state which is both contiguous to Colorado and which also has laws that allow a domestic association to establish business operations in that state under conditions which are determined by the commissioner to be not more restrictive than those provided in articles 40 to 46 of this title. For the purpose of this subparagraph (IV), the place where an association "conducts its principal operations" means the place where the largest percentage of the aggregate deposits of the foreign association and all of its subsidiaries are held.

On or after January 1, 1991, a foreign association seeking to merge with a domestic association may be domiciled or have its principal offices in any state without regard to its proximity to this state and without regard to the statutory conditions required by subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5).

Whenever a foreign association which meets the criteria established by this subsection (1.5) proposes to merge with a domestic association, the foreign association shall make an application for prior approval to the commissioner in such form and with such information that the commissioner may require, and such application shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable filing fee in such amount as determined by the commissioner. Upon receipt of a properly submitted application for merger, the commissioner shall proceed to investigate the application in accordance with the provisions of this section. The commissioner shall not grant approval of the merger until he is satisfied that the criteria imposed by this section have been met and that the merger is not contrary to the public interest.

No foreign association may merge with a domestic association except in accordance with the provisions of this section, and no such merger may be completed without the approval of the commissioner.

Any officer of a foreign association that merges with a domestic association pursuant to this section whose primary duty is managing the day-to-day operations of the Colorado offices of such foreign association shall be a resident of Colorado.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or otherwise curtail the powers of the commissioner with respect to supervisory mergers as established in section

11-44-110.5

.

Any two or more associations are authorized to merge and become incorporated in one body by transfer of all their assets and obligations upon such terms as set forth in an agreement of merger. The respective boards of directors of such associations, by a majority vote of each board, shall make or authorize to be made between such associations an agreement of merger.

Copies of the proposed agreement of merger, signed by the president or vice-president of such association and verified by his affidavit and attested by the secretary or assistant secretary thereof with the seal of the association thereunto affixed, shall be submitted together with a fee in the amount established by the commissioner to the commissioner for his approval or disapproval, and he shall cause a certificate of approval or disapproval to be attached to said copies of the proposed agreement, one copy to be filed in the division and one returned to each of the associations.

If approved by the commissioner, such approved agreement shall be presented to the members of each of the merging associations at special meetings called for the purpose of considering and voting upon such approved agreement; but, in the case of associations having permanent stock, only the holders of the permanent stock shall be entitled to any notice other than the published notice of such special meeting or to vote upon the agreement of merger. The complete agreement of merger, as adopted by the boards of directors and approved by the commissioner, shall be furnished each member entitled to vote on such merger at the time notice of such meetings, as required by section 11-41-123, is given. If at such meetings two-thirds of all votes of the members present in person or by proxy and entitled to vote on such merger are in favor of such approved agreement, the associations may proceed to merge in accordance therewith. The proceedings of such meetings shall be submitted to the commissioner for his approval in the same manner as required for the submission of the agreement by the boards of directors. Unless the agreement of merger fixes a later effective date thereof, the effective date of merger shall be the date upon which the commissioner accepts for filing the certified copies of the proceedings of the meetings of members adopting the approved agreement of merger.

In the event any association involved in a proposed merger is a federal savings and loan association, the commissioner shall transmit to the federal office of thrift supervision or its successor, a copy of the proposed agreement of merger and shall not approve the agreement of merger unless and until he or she has been advised in writing by the federal office of thrift supervision or its successor that said office has no objection to the agreement.

No such transfer shall prejudice the right of any creditor of any such association to have payment of his debt out of the assets and property thereof, nor shall any creditor be thereby deprived of or prejudiced in any right of action then existing against the officers or directors of said association for any neglect or misconduct, and the reorganized association shall be liable for all obligations to members of the associations existing prior to such consolidation.

Upon the effective date of the merger, all of the assets and property of every kind and character, real, personal, and mixed and tangible and intangible, choses in action, rights and credits then owned by the merging associations or which inure to any of them, immediately by operation of law, and without any conveyance or transfer, and without any further act or deed, shall be vested in and become the property of the association into which the other associations are absorbed, which shall have, hold, and enjoy the same in its own right as fully and to the same extent as if the same were possessed, held, and enjoyed by the merging associations prior to such merger. Such association shall be a continuation of the entity and identity of the association into which the other associations are absorbed, and all of the rights and obligations of the merging associations shall remain unimpaired, and the association, at the time of the taking effect of such merger, shall succeed to all of the rights and obligations and duties and liabilities of the merging associations. All rights and remedies of creditors and all liens upon the property of the merging associations shall be preserved, and all debts, liabilities, and duties of the respective merging associations shall thenceforth attach to the association and may be enforced against it to the same extent as if such debts, liabilities, and duties had been incurred or contracted by it.

All pending actions or other judicial proceedings to which any of the associations is a party shall not be deemed to have abated or to have discontinued by reason of such merger but may be pressed to final judgment, order, or decree in the same manner as if a merger had not been made; or the association resulting from such merger may be substituted as a party to such action or proceedings, and any judgment, order, or decree may be rendered for or against it which might have been rendered for or against any of the merging associations theretofore involved in such action or other judicial proceedings.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 306, § 12.

CSA:

C. 25, § 15.

L. 39:

p. 256, § 33.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-21.

L. 69:

p. 1016, § 9.

L. 84:

(3) amended, p. 378, § 5, effective May 11.

L. 88:

(1.5) added, p. 458, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1.5)(a)(I), (1.5)(a)(II)(A) to (1.5)(a)(II)(C), and (5) amended, pp. 149, 138, §§ 56, 18, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

IP(1.5)(a) amended, p. 763, § 17, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

In 2000, subsection (1.5)(a)(II)(D), enacted in 1988, was renumbered as subsection (1.5)(a)(II.5) on revision.

Cross references:

For the "Home Owners' Loan Act of 1933", see Pub.L. 73-43, codified at 12 U.S.C. § 1461 et seq.

11-41-122. Membership fees.

Savings and loan associations shall not, directly or indirectly, charge any membership, admission, repurchase, withdrawal, or other fee, fine, penalty, or sum of money for the privilege of becoming, remaining, or ceasing to be a member of the association or for any other cause, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section; except that reasonable charges may be made to reflect the cost of servicing accounts and upon the making, transfer, or assumption of a loan and for defaults and prepayments of a loan and, after July 1, 1977, for the establishment and maintenance of any Keogh or individual retirement account. Reasonable notice of the amount of and conditions relating to such charges shall be given to affected members.

Subject to such additional limitations, conditions, and provisions as may be promulgated in regulations of the commissioner, a savings and loan association required under a subpoena issued in a civil action to prepare disclosures of private records shall be reimbursed by the requesting party for such services as follows:

For reproduction costs, including copies produced by printer or reproduction processes, the amount provided in section 13-32-104 (1), C.R.S. Costs of photographs, films, and other materials required shall be reimbursed at actual costs.

For travel expenses incurred as a result of compliance, the amount provided in section 13-33-103 (1), C.R.S.;

For personnel costs incurred as a result of compliance, the amount of two dollars and fifty cents for each quarter hour, or fraction thereof.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 354, § 8.

CSA:

C. 25, § 76.

L. 39:

p. 252, § 26.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-22.

L. 59:

p. 659, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-22.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 572, § 1, effective June 4.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 431, § 7, effective June 19.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 494, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 468, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 2008:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1881, § 15, effective August 5.